Utah statutes.
41-1a-706.   When division to transfer and issue new certificate.
The division shall reregister a vehicle in the name of the new owner and issue
a new certificate of registration and a new certificate of title:
(1)  upon receipt of the:
(a)  properly endorsed certificate of title;
(b)  certificate of registration;
(c)  proper application for registration; and
(d)  required fee; and
(2)  when satisfied as to the genuineness and regularity of the transfer and
the right of the transferee to a certificate of title.
